Massachusetts, session 194th, H2333.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 40W the following 
chapter:- 
CHAPTER 40X 
SECTION 1. Whereas the costs of municipal building construction are increasing at an 
unsustainable rate and local governments need flexibility in municipal building assistance to 
ensure that local needs for municipal facility space, downtown development, open space, and 
community space are met; and to promote the thoughtful planning and construction of municipal 
facility space in order to ensure safe and adequate plant facilities for the public, and to assist 
towns in meeting the cost thereof, there is hereby established a municipal building assistance 

of 6 10 program. It is in the best interests of the Commonwealth and its citizens to create an authority to 
achieve the objectives of effective management and planning of the commonwealth's 
investments in municipal building assets, ensuring the health, safety, security, and well-being of 
residents and staff, easing and preventing overcrowding, maintaining good repair, efficient and 
economical construction and maintenance, financial sustainability of the municipal building 
assistance program, thoughtful community development, smart growth, and accessibility. 
SECTION 1A. (a) There is hereby created a body politic and corporate and a public 
instrumentality to be known as the Massachusetts Municipal Building Authority, which shall be 
an independent public authority not subject to the supervision and control of any other executive 
office, department, commission, board, bureau, agency or political subdivision of the 
commonwealth except as specifically provided in any general or special law. The exercise by the 
authority of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be considered to be the performance of an 
essential public function. 
(b) The authority shall consist of the state treasurer, who shall serve as chairperson, the 
secretary of administration and finance, a representative of the Massachusetts Municipal 
Association, and 4 additional members appointed by the state treasurer, 2 of whom shall have 
practical experience in public building construction, or architecture and design, and 2 of whom 
shall be persons in the field of municipal management with demonstrated knowledge of 
Massachusetts facility needs and other relevant federal and state building standards, each of 
whom shall serve a term of 2 years; but, a person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for 
the unexpired term. An appointed member of the authority shall be eligible for reappointment. 
The authority shall annually elect 1 of its members to serve as vice-chairperson. Each member of 
the authority serving ex officio may appoint a designee pursuant to section 6A of chapter 30. 

of 6 33  (c) Four members of the authority shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of 4 
members of the authority shall be necessary and sufficient for any action taken by the authority. 
No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all 
the rights and duties of the authority. Members shall serve without pay but shall be reimbursed 
for actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties. The chairperson of 
the authority shall report to the governor and to the general court no less than annually, to assist 
the executive and legislative branches in coordinating community development and fiscal 
policies of the Commonwealth. 
(d) Any action of the authority may take effect immediately and need not be published or 
posted unless otherwise provided by law. Meetings of the authority shall be subject to section 
11A1/2 of chapter 30A; but, said section 11A1/2 shall not apply to any meeting of members of 
the authority serving ex officio in the exercise of their duties as officers of the Commonwealth so 
long as no matters relating to the official business of the authority are discussed and decided at 
the meeting. The authority shall be subject to all other provisions of said chapter 30A, and 
records pertaining to the administration of the authority shall be subject to section 42 of chapter 
30 and section 10 of chapter 66. All monies of the authority shall be considered to be public 
funds for purposes of chapter 12A. The operations of the authority shall be subject to chapter 
268A and chapter 268B and all other operational or administrative standards or requirements to 
the same extent as the office of the state treasurer. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 35SSS, the following section:- 

of 6 54  Section 35TTT. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context 
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:- 
"Authority", the Massachusetts Municipal Building Authority. 
"Dedicated sales tax revenue amount", all monies received by the Commonwealth equal 
to 0.5 percent of the receipts from sales, as defined by chapter 64H, and 0.5 percent of the sales 
price of purchases, as defined by chapter 64I, from that portion of the taxes imposed under said 
chapters 64H and 64I as excises upon the sale and use at retail of tangible property or of services, 
and upon the storage, use or other consumption of tangible property or of services, including 
interest thereon or penalties, but not including any portion of the taxes that constitute special 
receipts within the meaning of subsection (b 1/2) of section 10 of chapter 152 of the acts of 1997 
or within the meaning of subsection (b 1/2) of said section 10 of said chapter 152 or any portion 
of the taxes imposed on the sale of meals as defined in paragraph (h) of section 6 of said chapter 
64H. 
"Receipts from sales", gross receipts from nonexempt sales, less amounts abated or 
reimbursed. 
"Sales price of purchases", sales price of nonexempt purchases, less amounts abated or 
reimbursed. 
(b) There shall be established on the books of the commonwealth a separate fund, to be 
known as the Municipal Building Modernization and Reconstruction Trust Fund. There shall be 
credited to the fund the dedicated sales tax revenue amount. Annual receipts into the fund on 
account of any fiscal year shall be considered to meet the full obligation of the commonwealth to 
the authority for such fiscal year. 

of 6 76  (c) Amounts in the fund shall be held by the state treasurer or his designee, as trustee and 
not on account of the commonwealth, exclusively for the purposes of the authority, and the state 
treasurer shall disburse amounts in the fund to the authority, without further appropriation, upon 
the request from time to time of the executive director of the authority. All amounts in the fund, 
including investment earnings, shall be available for expenditure by the authority for any lawful 
purpose, including without limitation payment of debt service on debt obligations issued by the 
authority, and may be pledged to secure debt of the authority in such manner and according to 
such priority as the authority may determine. 
(d) The authority shall certify annually to the treasurer as trustee with copies provided to 
the clerks of the house and senate and to the house and senate committees on ways and means 
that it has made provision in its annual budget and its capital plan under section 17 of chapter 
70B for sufficient amounts to be available to meet debt service payments or other payments due 
under financing obligations, including, without limitation, leases or grant obligations. 
(e) Subject to applicable restrictions contained in any bond resolution, trust or security 
agreement or credit enhancement agreement, surety bond, or insurance policy related to 
indebtedness incurred by the authority, including without limitation coverage requirements, if the 
authority shall determine that the balance of the fund exceeds the amount necessary to achieve 
the purposes of the authority, including, without limitation, to meet debt service payments, lease 
payments and grant obligations, the authority may transfer the excess amount to the 
Commonwealth. 
(f) In order to increase the marketability of any bonds or notes of the trust which may be 
secured by or payable from amounts held in the fund, the sums to be credited to the fund are 

of 6 98 hereby impressed with a trust for the benefit of the trust and the holders from time to time of the 
bonds or notes, and in consideration of the acceptance of payment for the bonds or notes, the 
100 Commonwealth covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent holders and transferees of the 
101 bonds or notes that while the bond or note shall remain outstanding, and so long as the principal 
102 of or interest on the bond or note shall remain unpaid, the sums to be credited to the fund shall 
103 not be diverted from the control of the trust and, so long as the sums are necessary, as determined 
104 by the authority in accordance with any applicable bond resolution, trust or security agreement or 
105 credit enhancement agreement, surety bond or insurance policy related to indebtedness incurred 
106 by the trust, for the purposes for which they have been pledged, the rates of the excises imposed 
107 by said chapters 64H and 64I shall not be reduced below the rates prescribed by this section.